Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 4 Emergency Telephone Number 9-1-1 System
46-5-134.1.
Counties where the governing bodies of more than one local government have adopted a resolution to impose an enhanced 9-1-1 charge.

This Code section shall apply in counties where the governing bodies of more than one local government have adopted a resolution to impose a 9-1-1 charge in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-5-133 and notwithstanding any contrary provision of Code Section 46-5-133 or 46-5-134.

A wireless service supplier may certify to any of the governing bodies described in subsection (a) of this Code section that the wireless service supplier is unable to determine whether the billing addresses of its subscribers are within the geographic area that is served by such local government. Upon such certification, the wireless service supplier shall be authorized to collect the 9-1-1 charge for wireless enhanced 9-1-1 services from any of its subscribers whose billing address is within the county and is within an area that is as close as reasonably possible to the geographic area that is served by such local government. The wireless service supplier shall notify such subscribers that if such subscriber’s billing address is not within the geographic area served by such local government, such subscriber is not obligated to pay the 9-1-1 charge for wireless enhanced 9-1-1 service.

Unless otherwise provided in an agreement among the governing bodies described in subsection (a) of this Code section, the charges collected by a wireless service supplier pursuant to this Code section shall be remitted to such governing bodies based upon the number of calls from wireless telecommunications connections that each such individual local government receives and counts relative to the total number of calls from wireless telecommunications connections that are received and counted by all of such local governments.

The powers granted to a wireless service supplier pursuant to this Code section shall terminate:

On the date that the wireless service supplier certifies to a governing body of a local government described in subsection (a) of this Code section that the wireless service supplier is able to determine whether the billing addresses of its subscribers are within the geographic area that is served by such governing body; or

On the date which is 180 days from the date that any of its subscribers were first billed under this Code section, whichever is earlier.

Upon termination of such powers, the wireless service supplier shall collect the 9-1-1 charge for wireless enhanced 9-1-1 service as provided in Code Section 46-5-134.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-134.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 873, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 46/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-13/HB 751.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” four times in subsections (a), (b), and (d).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “wireless enhanced” following “a resolution to impose a” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), in the second sentence, inserted “9-1-1 charge for” and substituted “services” for “charge”, and substituted “service” for “charge” at the end of the third sentence; and, in subsection (d), added a colon at the end of the introductory paragraph, and
substituted “On” for “on” at the beginning of paragraphs (d)(1) and (d)(2).

The 2010 amendment,

effective June 3, 2010, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “charge” following “enhanced 9-1-1” in the undesignated language at the end of subsection (d).

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, substituted “bodies” for “authorities” throughout this Code section; substituted “powers” for “authority” near the beginning of subsection (d) and in the ending undesignated paragraph of subsection (d); in paragraph (d)(1), substituted “body of a local government” for “authority” near the middle and substituted “body” for “authority” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

46-5-134.2.
Prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge; definitions; imposition of fee by localities; collection and remission of charges; distribution of funds.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Commissioner” means the state revenue commissioner.

“Consumer” means a person who purchases prepaid wireless service in a retail transaction.

“Department” means the Department of Revenue.

“Prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge” means the charge that is required to be collected by a seller from a consumer in the amount established under subsection (b) of this Code section.

Reserved.

“Provider” means a person that provides prepaid wireless service pursuant to a license issued by the Federal Communications Commission.

“Retail transaction” means the purchase of prepaid wireless service from a seller for any purpose other than resale.

“Seller” means a person who sells prepaid wireless service to another person.

“Wireless telecommunications service” means commercial mobile radio service as defined by 47 C.F.R. Section 20.3, as amended.

Counties and municipalities that operate a 9-1-1 public safety answering point, including counties and municipalities that operate multijurisdictional or regional 9-1-1 systems or have created a joint authority pursuant to Code Section 46-5-138, are authorized to impose by ordinance or resolution a prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge in the amount of $1.50 per retail transaction. Imposition of the charge authorized by this Code section by a county or municipality shall be contingent upon compliance with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (j) of this Code section.

Where a county or municipality that operates a 9-1-1 public safety answering point fails to comply with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (j) of this Code section by December 31, 2011, on and after that date, the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge authorized by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be imposed within the jurisdiction of such counties and municipalities as a state fee for state purposes.

Where a county or municipality imposes a prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge as authorized by paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section, or the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge is imposed by the State of Georgia by paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section, the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge shall be collected by the seller from the consumer with respect to each retail transaction occurring in this state. The amount of the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge shall be either separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the consumer by the seller or otherwise disclosed to the consumer.

For the purposes of subsection (c) of this Code section, a retail transaction that is effected in person by a consumer at a business location of the seller shall be treated as occurring in this state if that business location is in this state, and any other retail transaction shall be treated as occurring in this state if the retail transaction is treated as occurring in this state for purposes of a prepaid wireless calling service as provided in paragraph (3) of subsection (e) of Code Section 48-8-77.

The prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge shall be the liability of the consumer and not of the seller or of any provider, except that the seller shall be liable to remit all prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charges that the seller collects from consumers as provided in this Code section, including all such charges that the seller is deemed to collect where the amount of the charge has not been separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer by the seller.

The amount of the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge that is collected by a seller from a consumer, if such amount is separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer by the seller, shall not be included in the base for measuring any tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by this state, any political subdivision of this state, or any intergovernmental agency.

If a minimal amount of prepaid wireless service is sold with a prepaid wireless device for a single, nonitemized price, then the seller may elect not to apply the amount specified in subsection (b) of this Code section to such transaction.

If a minimal amount of prepaid wireless service is separately priced and sold as part of a single retail transaction that does not contain a prepaid wireless device or another prepaid wireless service, then the seller may elect not to apply the amount specified in subsection (b) of this Code section to such transaction.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “minimal” means an amount of service denominated as ten minutes or less or $5.00 or less.

Prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charges collected by sellers shall be remitted to the commissioner at the times and in the manner provided by Chapter 8 of Title 48 with respect to the sales and use tax imposed on prepaid wireless calling service. The commissioner shall establish registration and payment procedures that substantially coincide with the registration and payment procedures that apply to the sale of prepaid wireless calling service under Chapter 8 of Title 48. Audit and appeal procedures applicable under Chapter 8 of Title 48 shall apply to the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge. The commissioner shall establish procedures by which a seller of prepaid wireless service may document that a sale is not a retail transaction, which procedures shall substantially coincide with the procedures for documenting sale for resale transactions under Chapter 8 of Title 48. Nothing in this Code section shall authorize the commissioner to require that sellers of prepaid wireless services identify, report, or specify the jurisdiction within which the retail sale of such services occurred.

A seller shall be permitted to deduct and retain 3 percent of prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charges that are collected by the seller from consumers.

Prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charges remitted to the commissioner as provided in this Code section shall be distributed to counties, municipalities, and the State of Georgia as follows:

On or before December 31 of the year prior to the first year that the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge is imposed, each county and municipal corporation levying the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge, including counties and municipalities levying the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge that operate multijurisdictional or regional 9-1-1 systems or have created a joint authority pursuant to Code Section 46-5-138, shall file with the commissioner a certified copy of the pertinent parts of all ordinances and resolutions and amendments thereto which levy the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge authorized by this Code section. The ordinance or resolution specified herein shall specify an effective date of January 1, 2012, and impose a prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge in the amount specified in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section. The filing required by this paragraph shall be a condition of the collection of the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge within any county or municipality;

Each county or municipality operating a public safety answering point that has levied the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge authorized by this Code section and complied with the filing requirement of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive an amount calculated by multiplying the total amount remitted to the commissioner monthly times a fraction, the numerator of which is the population of the jurisdiction or jurisdictions operating the public safety answering point and the denominator of which is the total population of this state. An amount calculated by multiplying the total amount remitted to the commissioner monthly times a fraction, the numerator of which is the total population of any jurisdiction or jurisdictions operating public safety answering points that have not complied with the filing requirement of paragraph (1) of this subsection and the denominator of which is the total population of this state, shall be deposited as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the initial monthly distribution shall be calculated using the total amount remitted to the commissioner beginning January 1, 2019, and ending January 31, 2019.

For the purposes of this paragraph, population shall be measured by the United States decennial census of 2010 or any future such census plus any corrections or revisions contained in official statements by the United States Bureau of the Census made prior to the first day of September immediately preceding the distribution of the proceeds of such charges by the commissioner and any official census data received by the commissioner from the United States Bureau of the Census or its successor agency pertaining to any newly incorporated municipality. Such corrections, revisions, or additional data shall be certified to the commissioner by the Office of Planning and Budget on or before August 31 of each year;

Funds shall be distributed monthly not later than 30 days following the date charges must be remitted by the seller to the department. Such distribution shall include any delinquent charges actually collected by the commissioner for a previous fiscal year which have not been previously distributed;

Funds distributed to a county or municipality pursuant to this Code section shall be deposited and accounted for in a separate restricted revenue fund known as the Emergency Telephone System Fund, maintained by the local government pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Code Section 46-5-134. The commissioner shall deposit all funds received pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section into the general fund of the state treasury in compliance with Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the “Budget Act.” It is the intention of the General Assembly, subject to the appropriation process, that an amount equal to the amount deposited into the general fund of the state treasury as provided in this paragraph be appropriated each year to a program of state grants to counties and municipalities administered by the department for the purpose of supporting the operations of public safety answering points in the improvement of 9-1-1 service delivery. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the 9-1-1 grant program; and

Notwithstanding a county’s or municipality’s failure to comply with the filing requirement of paragraph (1) of this subsection prior to January 1, 2012, a county or municipality that subsequently meets such filing requirements prior to January 1 of any subsequent year shall become eligible to participate in the next succeeding distribution of proceeds pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of this subsection.

No provider or seller of prepaid wireless service shall be liable for damages to any person resulting from or incurred in connection with the provision of, or failure to provide, 9-1-1 or enhanced 9-1-1 service, or for identifying, or failing to identify, the telephone number, address, location, or name associated with any person or device that is accessing or attempting to access 9-1-1 or enhanced 9-1-1 service.

No provider or seller of prepaid wireless service shall be liable for damages to any person resulting from or incurred in connection with the provision of any lawful assistance to any investigative or law enforcement officer of the United States, this or any other state, or any political subdivision of this or any other state in connection with any lawful investigation or other law enforcement activity by such law enforcement officer.

In addition to the liability provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the provisions of Code Section 46-5-135 shall apply to sellers and providers of prepaid wireless service.

The prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge authorized by this Code section shall be the only 9-1-1 funding obligation imposed with respect to prepaid wireless service in this state, and no tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge shall be imposed by this state, any political subdivision of this state, or any intergovernmental agency for 9-1-1 funding purposes upon any provider, seller, or consumer with respect to the sale, purchase, use, or provision of prepaid wireless service.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-134.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 393, § 3/HB 256; Ga. L. 2011, p. 563, § 3/SB 156; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 46/HB 942; Ga. L. 2012, p. 820, § 4/HB 1049; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-14/HB 751.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2012.

The 2012 amendments.

The first 2012 amendment, effective May 1, 2012, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “47 C.F.R. Section 20.3” for “Section 20.3 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations” in paragraph (a)(9); substituted “75¢” for “75 cents” in paragraph (b)(1); and revised punctuation in subsection (g). The second 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, deleted “telecommunications” following “prepaid wireless” throughout this Code section; substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of paragraph (a)(5), which read: “ ‘Prepaid wireless telecommunications service’ has the same meaning as prepaid wireless service as such term is defined in Code Section 46-5-122”; substituted “47 C.F.R. Section 20.3” for “Section 20.3 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations” in paragraph (a)(9); in paragraph (b)(1), in the first sentence, substituted “75¢” for “75 cents”, and, in the second sentence, substituted “charge authorized” for “fee authorized” and substituted “shall be contingent” for “is contingent”; inserted the first and second occurrences of “prepaid wireless” in the first and second sentences of subsection (c); designated the existing first sentence of subsection (g) as
paragraph (g)(1), added paragraph (g)(2), and designated the former second sentence of subsection (g) as present paragraph (g)(3); substituted “wireless services” for “wireless calling services” in the last sentence of subsection (h); in paragraph (j)(1), substituted “prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge” for “fee” throughout, deleted “the” following “On or before” near the beginning of the first sentence and substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of the last sentence; in subparagraph (j)(2)(A), inserted “on” in the first and second sentences, and substituted “this state” for “the state” near the end of the first sentence; substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of subparagraph (j)(2(C) and paragraphs (j)(3) and (j)(4); and, in paragraph (j)(5), inserted “to” preceding “paragraph (4)” in the second sentence and substituted “; and” for a period at the end of the last sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, substituted “$1.50” for “75¢” near the end of the first sentence of paragraph (b)(1); in subparagraph (j)(2)(A), substituted “monthly” for “during the 12 month period ending on June 30” in the middle of the first and second sentences, and substituted “paragraph (4)” for “paragraph (5)” near the end of the second sentence; in subparagraph (j)(2)(B), inserted “monthly” in the middle, and substituted “beginning January 1, 2019, and ending January 31, 2019” for “during the six-month period beginning January 1, 2012, and ending June 30, 2012”; substituted “monthly not later than 30 days following the date charges must be remitted by the seller to the department” for “annually on or before October 15 of each year” in the first sentence of paragraph (j)(3); deleted former paragraph (j)(4), which read: “Prior to calculating the distributions to county and municipal governments as provided in this subsection, the commissioner shall subtract an amount, not to exceed 2 percent of remitted charges, to defray the cost of administering and distributing funds from the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge. Such amount shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury;”; redesignated former paragraph (j)(5) as present paragraph (j)(4), and, in present paragraph (j)(4), deleted “, other than the funds received pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection,” following “Code section” in the second sentence; and redesignated former paragraph (j)(6) as present paragraph (j)(5). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 393, § 4 and Ga. L. 2011, p. 563, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provide, in part, that those Acts shall become effective for local administrative purposes on May 12, 2011, and shall become effective for all purposes on January 1, 2012. The Acts further provide that in no event shall a prepaid wireless 9-1-1 fee and charge be imposed prior to January 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 393, § 2, and Ga. L. 2011, p. 563, § 2, both repealed former Code Section

46-5-134.2

, relating to 9-1-1 charges for prepaid wireless services, and enacted identical versions of the present Code section. The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

46-5-134.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

46-5-135.
Liability of service supplier in civil action.

A service supplier, including any company providing telephone services and its employees, directors, officers, and agents, is not liable for any damages in a civil action for injuries, death, or loss to persons or property incurred by any person as a result of any act or omission of a service supplier or any of its employees, directors, officers, or agents, except for willful or wanton misconduct, either in connection with developing, adopting, implementing, maintaining, or operating any emergency 9-1-1 system or in the identification of the telephone number, address, or name associated with any person accessing an emergency 9-1-1 system.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-135

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 179, § 5; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” twice in this Code section.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “any company providing telephone services” for “any telephone company” near the beginning of this Code section.

46-5-136.
Authority of local government to create advisory board.

The governing authority of a local government by resolution shall create an advisory board consisting of the sheriff, representatives from other public safety agencies which respond to emergency calls under the 9-1-1 system, and other individuals knowledgeable of emergency 9-1-1 systems and the emergency needs of the citizens of the local government, provided that such advisory board shall not exceed 13 members.

The advisory board shall assist the local government in:

Reviewing and analyzing the progress by public safety agencies in developing 9-1-1 system requirements;

Recommending steps of action to effect the necessary coordination, regulation, and development of a 9-1-1 system;

Identifying mutual aid agreements necessary to effect the 9-1-1 system;

Assisting in the promulgation of necessary rules, regulations, operating procedures, schedules, and other such policy and administrative devices as shall be deemed necessary and appropriate; and

Providing other services as may be deemed appropriate by the local government.

The members of the advisory board shall not be compensated from moneys deposited into the Emergency Telephone System Fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-136

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 179, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1645, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” four times in subsections (a) and (b).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “9-1-1” following “emergency calls under the” in subsection (a).

46-5-137.
Powers of Public Service Commission not affected.

This part shall not be construed as affecting the jurisdiction or powers of the Public Service Commission to establish rates, charges, or tariffs.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-137

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 179, § 7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9, effective July 1, 2005, reenacted this Code section without change.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, reenacted this Code section without change.

46-5-138.
Joint authorities.

By proper resolution of the local governing bodies, an authority may be created and activated by:

Any two or more municipal corporations;

Any two or more counties; or

One or more municipal corporations and one or more counties.

The resolutions creating and activating a joint authority shall specify the number of members of the authority, the number to be appointed by each participating county or municipal corporation, their terms of office, and their residency requirements.

The resolutions creating and activating joint authorities may be amended by appropriate concurrent resolutions of the participating governing bodies.

The public authority shall be authorized to contract with the counties or municipalities which formed the authority to operate an emergency 9-1-1 system for such local governments throughout the corporate boundaries of such local governments. Pursuant to such contracts, the local governments shall be authorized to provide funding to the authority from the Emergency Telephone System Fund maintained by each local government. No authority shall be formed until each local government forming the authority has imposed a monthly 9-1-1 charge or a monthly wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charge.

Each authority shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this part, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

To bring and defend actions;

To adopt and amend a corporate seal;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary to exercise the powers of the authority;

To receive and administer gifts, grants, and devises of any property;

To operate emergency call answering services for law enforcement, emergency management, fire, and emergency medical service agencies 24 hours a day, seven days a week, 365 days a year;

To acquire, by purchase, gift, or construction, any real or personal property desired to be acquired to operate the emergency 9-1-1 system;

To sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, mortgage, dispose of, or grant options for any real or personal property or interest therein for any such purposes; and

To mortgage, convey, pledge, or assign any properties, revenues, income, tolls, charges, or fees owned or received by the authority.

The authority shall elect a chairperson and such other officers as deemed necessary by the authority. The authority shall select a director who shall be responsible for establishing operating standards and procedures and overseeing the operations of the emergency 9-1-1 system. The director may be an employee working in the operation of the emergency 9-1-1 system. The authority shall be responsible for hiring, training, supervising, and disciplining employees working in the operation of the emergency 9-1-1 system. An appropriate number of full-time and part-time employees shall be hired to operate the emergency 9-1-1 system. The authority shall determine the compensation of such employees and shall be authorized to provide other employee benefits. The authority shall submit its annual budget and a report of its financial records to the local governments which created the authority.

The authority may contract with a service supplier in the same manner that local governments are so authorized under the provisions of this part.

Notwithstanding subsection (i) of Code Section 46-5-134, if the joint authority and each local governing body activating the joint authority certify to the service provider in writing prior to the end of the 18 month period in advance of the date on which the 9-1-1 system was to have become fully operational that the system cannot be placed in operation on the date originally projected but that all parties are proceeding in a diligent and timely fashion to implement such service, the service provider shall continue to collect the monthly 9-1-1 charge for an additional period of 18 months or until the 9-1-1 system becomes fully operational, whichever occurs first.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and constitute a public purpose, and the authority shall be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this Code section. This state covenants that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired or leased by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision, or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the buildings erected or acquired by it, or upon any fees, rentals, or other charges for the use of such buildings, or upon other income received by the authority. The exemption provided in this Code section shall include an exemption from state and local sales and use tax on property purchased by the authority for use exclusively by the authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-138

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1368, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 12; Ga. L. 2004, p. 366, § 2A; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added subsection (f).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” eleven times in subsections (b), (c), (d), and (f) and added subsection (g).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “, including the Wireless Phase I and Phase II Reserve Accounts,” following “Fund” near the end of the second sentence in subsection (b); substituted “system” for “service” twice in subsection (f); and substituted “purpose, and the authority shall” for “purpose and that the authority will” near the end of the first sentence in subsection (g).

46-5-138.1.
Guidelines pertaining to additional charges involving contracts between two or more counties.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-5-134 to the contrary, where two or more counties, none of which offers emergency 9-1-1 system services on May 1, 1998, and any participating municipalities within such counties, if any, agree by intergovernmental contract to initiate or contract for the joint operation of an emergency 9-1-1 system for the first time after May 1, 1998, such local governments may impose a monthly 9-1-1 charge which exceeds $1.50 per telephone service but only so long as the following procedure shall be followed:

The participating local governments shall, with input from a telephone service supplier, prepare an estimated budget for the implementation of the joint emergency 9-1-1 system with costs limited to items eligible for funding through the Emergency Telephone System Fund;

An estimate of the revenue to be generated by the 9-1-1 charge authorized by paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-5-134 during the first 18 months of collection shall be prepared;

If the total amount necessary for implementation of the emergency 9-1-1 system in paragraph (1) of this subsection exceeds the estimated revenue from imposition of the 9-1-1 charge specified in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the monthly 9-1-1 charge per telephone service may be increased on a pro rata basis during the first 18 months of collection to the extent necessary to provide revenue sufficient to pay the amount specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection, but in no case shall such monthly charge be greater than $2.50 per telephone service. Notwithstanding subsection (i) of Code Section 46-5-134, if each local governing body which is a party to an intergovernmental contract certifies to the service provider in writing prior to the end of the 18 month period in advance of the date on which the 9-1-1 system was to have become fully operational that the system cannot be placed in operation on the date originally projected but that all parties are proceeding in a diligent and timely fashion to implement such service, the service provider shall continue to collect the monthly 9-1-1 charge for an additional period of 18 months or until the 9-1-1 system becomes fully operational, whichever occurs first; and

Such local governments shall comply with the requirements of Code Section 46-5-133 which relate to the imposition of a monthly 9-1-1 charge.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize the imposition of any charge upon a wireless service. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the requirements of Code Section 46-5-134 which relate to monthly 9-1-1 charges on telephone services shall apply to charges imposed pursuant to this subsection.

The increased monthly 9-1-1 charge authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section shall also be available to any joint 9-1-1 authority created pursuant to Code Section 46-5-138 after May 1, 1998.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-138.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 13; Ga. L. 2004, p. 366, § 2B; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added the last sentence in paragraph (a)(3).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ”
throughout this Code section.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in subsection (a), substituted “telephone service” for “exchange access facility” throughout the subsection, in the introductory paragraph, inserted “system” preceding “services” and substituted “shall be” for “is”, substituted “telephone” for “local exchange” in paragraph (a)(1); substituted “system” for “service” twice in paragraph (a)(3), inserted “shall” in paragraph (a)(4), and, in the ending undesignated paragraph, substituted “service” for “telecommunications connection”, and substituted “telephone services” for “exchange access facilities”.

46-5-138.2.
“Director” defined; training and instruction.

As used in this Code section, the term “director” means any person having direct operational control of a public safety answering point, any person who has as part of his or her duties supervisory responsibility for one or more communication officers or other employees who answer 9-1-1 calls received by a public safety answering point, or any person who has system management responsibility for the public safety answering point.

In addition to any training required under federal or state law, any persons becoming a director on or after January 1, 2024, shall enroll in, attend, and complete satisfactorily a course of training and instruction on the management of public safety answering points and the establishment and operation of 9-1-1 systems. Such course of instruction for directors shall be developed and made available by the center subject to the availability and receipt of funding.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-138.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 46/SB 455; Ga. L. 2022, p. 413, § 3/SB 505.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

effective May 12, 2008, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised capitalization in subsection (a).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “persons becoming a director on or after January 1, 2024, shall enroll” for “persons serving as a director may enroll” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

46-5-139.
[Reserved] Joint Study Committee on Wireless Enhanced 9-1-1 Charges.

History.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 14; repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470, effective July 1, 2005.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2005.